Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-132
Complaint; hearing; notice; order.

If a carrier or jurisdictional utility does not satisfy a complaint filed pursuant to section 75-131 within the time allowed and there appears to be a reasonable ground for investigation of the complaint upon its merits, the commission shall convene a hearing on the matters complained of pursuant to its rules of procedure and shall give the parties written notice of the time and place for such hearing. After the hearing, the commission shall make such order with respect to the complaint as it deems just and reasonable. Such order must be consistent with the statutory authority that formed the basis for the complaint.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 32, p. 1367;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 45;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 71.